test/src/gt-desc-yamls/A-peraedue03_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - perädü: # Adjective (3) perädü 'eng /est päratu/fin' - full paradigm
     perädü+A+Sg+Nom: perädü
     perädü+A+Sg+Gen: perädü
     perädü+A+Sg+Par: perätüt
     perädü+A+Sg+Ill: perätühe
     perädü+A+Pl+Gen: perätüide
     perädü+A+Pl+Par: perätüid
     perädü+A+Pl+Ill: perätüihe
     perädü+A+Pl+All: perätüile

     perädü+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [perätümb, perätümp, perätüp]
